apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="p/artur__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>artur</l>     <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arturinn</l>  <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artar</l>     <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artarnir</l>  <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>art</l>       <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artinn</l>    <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arta</l>      <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artana</l>    <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arti</l>      <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artinum</l>   <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örtum</l>     <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örtunum</l>   <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arts</l>      <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artsins</l>   <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arta</l>      <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>artanna</l>   <r>artur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ágreining/ur__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>urinn</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>num</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>sins</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="frægð__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inni</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arinnar</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jap/anska__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>anska</l>     <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anskan</l>    <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önsku</l>     <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önskuna</l>   <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önsku</l>     <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önskunni</l>  <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önsku</l>     <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önskunnar</l> <r>anska<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="meg/in__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nið</l>       <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>nið</l>       <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ni</l>        <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ninu</l>      <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>insins</l>    <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="millig/anga__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l>anga</l>      <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>angan</l>     <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngu</l>      <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>önguna</l>    <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngu</l>      <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngunni</l>   <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngu</l>      <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>öngunnar</l>  <r>anga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vinnubr/ögð__n_nt">
      <e>       <p><l>ögð</l>       <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögðin</l>     <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögð</l>       <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögðin</l>     <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögðum</l>     <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögðunum</l>   <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agða</l>      <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agðanna</l>   <r>ögð<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vinnubrögð">      <i>vinnubr</i><par n="vinnubr/ögð__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tilurð">          <i>tilurð</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mótun">           <i>mótun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kjördæmaskipan">  <i>kjördæmaskipan</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="notkun">          <i>notkun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="röðun">           <i>röðun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mengun">          <i>mengun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sigurganga">      <i>sigurg</i><par n="millig/anga__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="frægð">           <i>frægð</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Sjálfstæðisflokkur"><i>Sjálfstæðisflokk</i><par n="ágreining/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="myndlist">        <i>myndlist</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="endurnýjun">      <i>endurnýjun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ágreiningur">     <i>ágreining</i><par n="ágreining/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="umritun">         <i>umritun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="frelsun">         <i>frelsun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="líkan">           <i>líkan</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leiklist">        <i>leiklist</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="arfleifð">        <i>arfleifð</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="misskilningur">   <i>misskilning</i><par n="ágreining/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nálgun">          <i>nálgun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leikstjórn">      <i>leikstjórn</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="grennd">          <i>grennd</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="meðvitund">       <i>meðvitund</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="hljóðritun">      <i>hljóðritun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sálarró">         <i>sálarró</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="megin">           <i>meg</i><par n="meg/in__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="einangrun">       <i>einangrun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gervigreind">     <i>gervigreind</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="almenningur">     <i>almenning</i><par n="ágreining/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kvikmyndagerð">   <i>kvikmyndagerð</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="alþjóð">          <i>alþjóð</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="yfirumsjón">      <i>yfirumsjón</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vanlíðan">        <i>vanlíðan</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skógrækt">        <i>skógrækt</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="milliganga">      <i>millig</i><par n="millig/anga__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ritun">           <i>ritun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="upplifun">        <i>upplifun</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="greind">          <i>greind</i><par n="frægð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="japanska">        <i>jap</i><par n="jap/anska__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="partur">          <i>p</i><par n="p/artur__n_m"/></e>
